Utah statutes.
59-14-505.   Separate offenses -- Evidence of intended sale of products.

Each article, package, or container not having a warning label affixed, as required by Section 59-14-501, is considered a separate offense.  The presence of any article, package, or container of smokeless tobacco products in the place of business of any person required by this chapter to affix warning labels is prima facie evidence that those articles, packages, or containers are intended for sale and are subject to this part.

